Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.340.060

Rules.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules as necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out the provisions of RCW 28A.340.010 through 28A.340.070.

(2) When the joint operation of programs or services includes the teaching of all or substantially all of the curriculum for a particular grade or grades in only one local school district, the rules shall provide that the affected students are attending school in the district in which they reside for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and chapter 28A.545 RCW.

[ 1990 c 33 s 371; 1988 c 268 s 8. Formerly RCW 28A.100.090.]

NOTES:

Findings—Severability—1988 c 268: See notes following RCW 28A.340.010.